Utah statutes.
73-21-1.   Approval of Ute Indian Water Compact.
The within Compact, the Ute Indian Water Compact, providing for the execution
by the State of Utah, the Ute Indian Tribe of the Uintah and Ouray
Reservations, Utah, and the United States of America, through their various
representatives, is hereby authorized, confirmed, and approved for the State
of Utah.
